Missouri, session 2026, HB3025.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 167.632, to read as follows:
167.632. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Charter school", any charter school established under chapter 160 with
forty percent or more of its students residing in households with a household income
that does not exceed one hundred eighty-five percent of the most recent poverty
guidelines updated periodically in the Federal Register by the U.S. Department of
Health and Human Services under the authority of 42 U.S.C. Section 9902(2), as
amended;
(2) "Period products", tampons and sanitary napkins for use in connection with
the menstrual cycle;
(3) "School building", any facility owned or leased by a charter school or a
school district:
(a) Over which the charter school or the school board of the school district has
care, custody, or control; and
(b) In which there is a charter school or a middle school or junior high school
serving students in grades six to eight or a charter school or a high school serving
students in grades nine to twelve;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3025 2
(4) "School district", any public school district in which forty percent or more of
the students reside in households with a household income that does not exceed one
hundred eighty-five percent of the most recent poverty guidelines updated periodically
in the Federal Register by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services under
the authority of 42 U.S.C. Section 9902(2), as amended.
2. Beginning July 1, 2027, each charter school and school district shall provide
period products in the restrooms of each of the charter school's or district's school
buildings.
3. Each charter school and school district shall provide period products at no
charge to students. The total costs under this section shall be borne by the state from
funds appropriated to the department of elementary and secondary education for that
specific purpose.
✔